California statutes. Vehicle Code
(a) The manufacturer of equipment used in the assembly of an authorized emergency vehicle, as defined in Section 165, used by a local public fire service agency shall, upon request of the fire department, reimburse the agency for the cost of repairs to the vehicle if (1) the repair was made to correct a manufacturer’s defect, and (2) the vehicle is placed on a safety-related recall to correct that defect.

(b) A final stage equipment manufacturer is deemed to be an original
 equipment manufacturer in the event of a warranty dispute with a local public fire service agency regarding the failure of component parts used in the assembly of the agency’s authorized emergency vehicle. As used in this section, “final stage equipment manufacturer” means the manufacturer who assembles the authorized emergency vehicle from one or more components supplied by other manufacturers.

(c) The Legislature finds and declares that local public fire service agencies of this state are entitled to safe and efficient use of their equipment, and that defects in emergency equipment, especially emergency vehicles, endanger the firefighters of California and the public they serve. It is the intent of the Legislature to ensure that these defects are repaired as expeditiously as possible and with no expense to the local public fire service agencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1220, Sec. 65.   Effective September 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

24007.2.

If a dealer, or a person holding a retail seller’s permit, sells to an elderly low-income person, as defined in Section 39026.5 of the Health and Safety Code, a 1966 through 1970 model year motor vehicle which is not equipped, as required pursuant to Sections 43654 and 43656 of that code, with a certified device to control its exhaust emission of oxides of nitrogen, the dealer or such person, as the case may be, shall install the required certified device on the motor vehicle without cost to the elderly low-income person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 231.)
-------------------------------------------

24007.5.

(a) (1) No auctioneer or public agency shall sell, at public auction, any vehicle specified in subdivision (a) of Section 24007, which is not in compliance with this code.

(2) Paragraph (1) does not apply to a vehicle that is sold under the conditions specified in subdivision (c), (d), (e), or (g) or is sold to a dealer or for the purpose of being wrecked or dismantled or is sold exclusively for off-highway use.

(b) Except with respect to the sale of a vehicle specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), the consignor of any vehicle, specified in subdivision (b) of Section 24007, sold at public auction, shall provide the purchaser a
 valid certificate of compliance or certificate of noncompliance, as appropriate, issued in accordance with Section 44015 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, if, in the opinion of a public utility or public agency, the cost of repairs to a vehicle exceeds the value of the vehicle to the public utility or public agency, the public utility or public agency shall, as transferee or owner, surrender the certificates of registration, documents satisfactory to the Department of Motor Vehicles showing proof of ownership, and the license plates issued for the vehicle to the Department of Motor Vehicles. As used in this section, “public utility” means a public utility as described in Sections 218, 222, and 234 of the Public Utilities Code.

(d) The public utility or public agency having complied with subdivision (c) shall, upon sale of the
 vehicle, give to the purchaser a bill of sale which includes, in addition to any other required information, the last issued license plate number.

(e) (1) Subdivisions (a) and (b) do not apply to any judicial sale, including, but not limited to, a bankruptcy sale, conducted pursuant to a writ of execution or order of court.

(2) Subdivision (b) does not apply to any lien sale if the lienholder does both of the following:

(A) Gives the notice required by subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 5900.

(B) Notifies the buyer that California law requires that the buyer obtain a certificate of compliance or noncompliance and register the vehicle with the department, and that failure to comply will result in a lien against any vehicle owned by
 the buyer pursuant to Section 10876 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, enforceable pursuant to Section 10877 of the Revenue and Taxation Code and Article 6 (commencing with Section 9800) of Chapter 6 of Division 3. Receipt of the notice required by this subparagraph shall be evidenced by the signature of the buyer.

(f) The exceptions in this section do not apply to any requirements for registration of a vehicle pursuant to Section 4000.1, 4000.2, or 4000.3.

(g) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (e), any public agency or auctioneer which sells, at public auction, any vehicle specified in subdivision (b) of Section 24007, which is registered to a public agency or a public utility, shall provide each bidder with a notice in writing that certificates of compliance are required to be obtained, certifying that the vehicle complies with Part 5 (commencing with Section 43000) of
 Division 26 of the Health and Safety Code and Article 6.5 (commencing with Section 9888.5) of Chapter 20.3 of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, before the vehicle may be registered in this state, unless the vehicle is sold to a dealer or for the purpose of being wrecked or dismantled or is sold exclusively for off-highway use. Prior to the sale of the vehicle, a public agency or public utility shall remove the license plates from the vehicle and surrender them to the department. The purchaser of the vehicle shall be given a bill of sale which includes, in addition to any other required information, the vehicle’s last issued license plate number.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 681, Sec. 26.   (AB 1263)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

24007.6.

Except for vehicles sold to a dealer or for the purpose of being wrecked or dismantled or sold exclusively for off-highway use, a salvage pool shall do both of the following:

(a) Give the notice required by subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 5900. 

(b) Notify the buyer that California law requires that the buyer obtain a certificate of compliance or noncompliance and to register the vehicle with the department, and that failure to comply will result in a lien against any vehicle owned by the buyer pursuant to Section 10876 of
 the Revenue and Taxation Code, enforceable pursuant to Section 10877 of the Revenue and Taxation Code and Article 6 (commencing with Section 9800) of Chapter 6 of Division 3. Receipt of the notice required by this paragraph shall be evidenced by the signature of the buyer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 996, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

24008.5.

(a) No person shall operate any motor vehicle with a frame height or body floor height greater than specified in subdivisions (b) and (c).

(b) The maximum frame height is as follows:Vehicle TypeFrame Height(1) Passenger vehicles, except housecars 23 inches(2) All other motor vehicles, including housecars,as follows:Up to 4,500 pounds GVWR 27 inches4,501 to 7,500 pounds GVWR 30 inches7,501 to 10,000 pounds GVWR 31 inches(c) The lowest portion of the body floor shall not be more than five inches above the top of the frame.

(d) The following definitions govern the construction of this section:

(1) “Frame” means the main longitudinal structural members of the chassis of the vehicle or, for vehicles with unitized body construction, the lowest main longitudinal structural members of the body of the vehicle.

(2) “Frame height” means the vertical distance between the ground and the lowest point on the frame, measured when the vehicle is unladen on a level surface at the lowest point on the frame midway between the front axle and the second axle on the vehicle.

(3) “GVWR” means the manufacturer’s gross vehicle weight rating, as defined in Section 390, whether or not the vehicle is modified by use of parts not originally installed by the manufacturer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 718, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

24009.

No person shall sell or offer for sale a new motor truck, truck tractor, or bus that is not equipped with an identification plate or marking bearing the manufacturer’s name and the manufacturer’s gross vehicle weight rating of such vehicle.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1287.)
-------------------------------------------

24010.

(a) No person engaged in the rental of any vehicle, for periods of 30 days or less, shall rent, lease or otherwise allow the operation of such vehicle unless all of the following requirements are met:

(1) All necessary equipment required by this code and regulations adopted pursuant to this code for the operation of the vehicle upon a highway has been provided or offered to the lessee for his or her use.

(2) The vehicle conforms to all applicable federal motor vehicle safety standards established pursuant to Chapter 301 (commencing with Section 30101) of Part A of Subtitle VI of Title 49 of the United States Code, and the regulations adopted pursuant to those provisions.

(3) The vehicle is mechanically sound and safe to operate within the meaning of Section 24002.

(b) In order to ensure compliance with this section, the department may conduct periodic inspections, without prior notice, of the business premises of persons engaged in the rental of vehicles for periods of 30
 days or less and of the vehicles themselves, for the purpose of ascertaining that the vehicles are in compliance with this section. Any vehicle which is found not in compliance shall not be rented or leased until proof of full compliance with this section is made to the satisfaction of the department.

(c) The contract or rental agreement shall include the name of the person from whom the vehicle is rented, leased or obtained, the address of that person’s place of business in this state where the vehicle is rented, leased, or delivered, and a statement of any required equipment refused by the person to whom the vehicle is rented, leased, or delivered.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 198, Sec. 23.   (AB 3246)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

24011.

Whenever a federal motor vehicle safety standard is established under federal law (49 U.S.C. Sec. 30101 et seq.), no dealer shall sell or offer for sale a vehicle to which the standard is applicable, and no person shall sell or offer for sale for use upon a vehicle an item of equipment to which the standard is applicable, unless:

(a) The vehicle or equipment conforms to the applicable federal standard.

(b) The vehicle or equipment bears
 thereon a certification by the manufacturer or distributor that it complies with the applicable federal standards. The certification may be in the form of a symbol prescribed in the federal standards or, if there is no federal symbol, by a symbol acceptable to the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 615, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

24011.3.

(a) Every manufacturer or importer of new passenger vehicles for sale or lease in this state, shall affix to a window or the windshield of the vehicle a notice with either of the following statements, whichever is appropriate:

(1) “This vehicle is equipped with bumpers that can withstand an impact of 2.5 miles per hour with no damage to the vehicle’s body and safety systems, although the bumper and related components may sustain damage. The bumper system on this vehicle conforms to the current federal bumper standard of 2.5 miles per hour.”

(2) “This vehicle is equipped with a front bumper
 of a type that has been tested at an impact speed of (here specify the appropriate number) miles per hour, and a rear bumper of a type that has been tested at an impact speed of (here specify the appropriate number) miles per hour, resulting in no damage to the vehicle’s body and safety systems and minimal damage to the bumper and attachment hardware. Minimal damage to the bumper means minor cosmetic damage that can be repaired with the use of common repair materials and without replacing any parts. The stronger the bumper, the less likely the vehicle will require repair after a low-speed collision. This vehicle exceeds the current federal bumper standard of 2.5 miles per hour.”

(b) The impact speed required to be specified in the notice pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) is the maximum speed of impact upon the bumper of the
 vehicle at which the vehicle sustains no damage to the body and safety systems and only
 minimal damage to the bumper when subjected to the fixed barrier and pendulum impact tests, and when subjected to the corner impact test at not less than 60 percent of that maximum speed, conducted pursuant to Part 581 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(c) (1) A manufacturer who willfully fails to affix the notice required by subdivision (a), or willfully misstates any information in the notice, is guilty of a misdemeanor, which shall be punishable by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500). Each failure or misstatement is a separate offense.

(2) A person who willfully defaces, alters, or removes the notice required by subdivision (a) prior to the delivery of the vehicle, to which the notice is required to be affixed, to
 the registered owner or lessee is guilty of a misdemeanor, which shall be punishable by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500). Each willful defacement, alteration, or removal is a separate offense.

(d) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Manufacturer” is any person engaged in the manufacture or assembly of new passenger vehicles for distribution or sale, and includes an importer of new passenger vehicles for distribution or sale and any person who acts for, or is under the control of, a manufacturer in connection with the distribution or sale of new passenger vehicles.

(2) “Passenger vehicle” means, notwithstanding Section 465, a motor vehicle subject to
 impact testing conducted pursuant to Part 581 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(3) “No damage” means that, when a passenger vehicle is
 subjected to impact testing, conducted pursuant to the conditions and test procedures of Sections 581.6 and 581.7 of Part 581 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, the vehicle sustains no damage to the body and safety systems.

(4) For purposes of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) and subdivision (b), “minimal damage to the bumper and attachment hardware” means damage that can be repaired with the use of common repair materials and without replacing any parts. In addition, not later than 30 minutes after completion of each pendulum or barrier impact test, the bumper face bar shall have no permanent deviation greater than three-quarters of one inch from its original contour and position relative to the vehicle frame and no permanent deviation greater than three-eighths of one inch from its original contour on
 areas of contact with the barrier face or impact ridge of the pendulum test device, measured from a straight line connecting the bumper contours adjoining the contact area.

(e) The notice required by this section may be included in any notice or label required by federal law to be affixed to a window or windshield of the vehicle.

(f) The notice required by this section shall, in an autonomous vehicle, as defined in Section 38750, that is not capable of operation by a human driver seated in the vehicle and not equipped with a windshield or windows, be affixed in the doorjamb, provided that this modification
 is consistent with, or authorized by, any applicable federal law, regulation, or exemption thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 428, Sec. 1.   (SB 570)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

24011.5.

(a) A dealer or manufacturer shall not sell any new passenger vehicle that is equipped with any partial driving automation feature, or provide any software update or other vehicle upgrade that adds any partial driving automation feature, without, at the time of delivering or upgrading the vehicle, providing the buyer or owner with a distinct notice that provides the name of the feature and clearly describes the functions and limitations of
 the feature.

(b) A manufacturer or dealer shall not name any partial driving automation feature, or describe any partial driving automation feature in marketing materials, using language that implies or would otherwise lead a reasonable person to believe, that the feature allows the vehicle to function as an autonomous vehicle, as defined in Section 38750, or otherwise has functionality not actually included in the feature.
 A violation of this subdivision shall be considered a misleading advertisement for the purposes of Section 11713.

(c) As used in this section, “partial driving automation feature” has the same meaning as “Level 2 partial driving automation” in the Society of Automotive Engineers (SAE) Standard J3016 (April 2021).

(d) Compliance with this section shall not alter any existing duty of care or limit the civil liability of a manufacturer or
 dealer, including, but not limited to, claims for negligence or product defect.

(e) Before delivering a passenger vehicle equipped with a partial driving automation feature to a dealer, a manufacturer shall provide information to enable the dealer to comply with subdivision (a). This information shall include specific language recommended for the notice required in that subdivision. A dealer may reasonably rely on the information provided by the manufacturer and a dealer shall not be held in violation of subdivision (a) if the manufacturer fails to provide this information to the dealer or if the information provided is deemed to be not in compliance with this section.

(f) A manufacturer shall not be held in violation of subdivision (a) if the manufacturer provides a dealer with the information required under subdivision (e) and the dealer fails to provide the required notice to the buyer or owner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 308, Sec. 1.   (SB 1398)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

24011.7.

(a) Nothing in Chapter 20.4 (commencing with Section 9889.50) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, shall be construed as having any effect on the existing inspection program conducted by the department. Rather, it is the intent of the Legislature that such program continue and that a cooperative relationship between the department and the Department of Consumer Affairs be established, under which the department can inform the Department of Consumer Affairs of the results and experiences of the department in order to provide data on exhaust and noise emission control device tampering and performance deterioration following mandatory
 inspections.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1154.)
-------------------------------------------

24012.

All lighting equipment or devices subject to requirements established by the department shall comply with the engineering requirements and specifications, including mounting and aiming instructions, determined and publicized by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 723.)
-------------------------------------------

24013.

No new motor vehicle shall be sold unless the seller provides the buyer with a statement of the minimum octane number of the gasoline for such vehicle.

As used in this section “octane number” means the octane number of the gasoline adopted by the Federal Trade Commission, and if the Federal Trade Commission does not adopt an octane number, then the American Society for Testing Materials research octane number of the gasoline as defined by Section 20710 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

24013.5.

(a) No dealer shall sell, offer for sale, or display for sale any new light duty truck with a manufacturer’s gross vehicle weight rating of 8,500 pounds or less unless there is securely affixed to the windshield or side window of the light duty truck a label on which the manufacturer has endorsed clearly, distinctly, and legibly, true and correct entries disclosing the following information concerning the light duty truck:

(1) The make, model, and serial or identification number or numbers.

(2) The retail
 price of the light duty truck as suggested by the manufacturer. 

(3) The retail delivered price, as suggested by the manufacturer, for each accessory or item of optional equipment which is physically attached to the light duty truck at the time of its delivery to the dealer and which is not included within the price of the light duty truck as stated pursuant to paragraph (2).

(4) The amount charged, if any, to the dealer for the transportation of the light duty truck to the location at which it is delivered to the dealer.

(5) The total of the amounts specified pursuant to paragraphs (2), (3), and (4).

(b) Subdivision (a) applies to every light duty truck sold, offered for sale, or displayed in California which is manufactured on or after September 1,
 1988.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 418, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

24014.

(a) A dealer shall not sell, offer for sale, or display, any new, assembled motorcycle on its premises, unless there is securely attached to its handlebar a label, in the form of a hang tag, approved by the Department of Motor Vehicles, furnished by the manufacturer, on which the manufacturer shall clearly indicate the
 following for that specific motorcycle:

(1) The recommended retail price of the motorcycle.

(2) The recommended price for each accessory or item of optional equipment physically attached to the motorcycle at the time of its delivery to the dealer.

(3) The manufacturer’s suggested retail price for the motorcycle, which is the sum of the prices in paragraphs (1) and (2).

(4) The vehicle identification number.

(b) A dealer shall not affix to a new motorcycle a supplemental price label containing a price that represents the dealer’s asking price that exceeds the manufacturer’s suggested retail price unless the label is in compliance with all of the following:

(1) The supplemental price label, in lieu of the supplemental sticker provided for in subdivision (q) of Section 11713.1, is securely attached to the handlebar of the motorcycle in a way that does not prevent access to the manufacturer’s hang tag and clearly and conspicuously discloses in the largest print appearing on the label, other than the
 print size used for the dealer’s name, that the supplemental label price is the dealer’s asking price, or words of similar import, and that it is not the manufacturer’s suggested retail price.

(2) The supplemental label clearly and conspicuously discloses the manufacturer’s suggested retail price.

(3) The supplemental label lists each item for which the dealer imposes a charge that is not included in the manufacturer’s suggested retail price, and discloses the additional price of each item, including, but not limited to, the amount charged by the dealer for assembly, preparation, or both, and the amount charged by the dealer for transportation to the dealership. Charges disclosed shall be net of reimbursement received by the dealer from the manufacturer.

(4) If the supplemental label price is greater than the sum of
 the manufacturer’s suggested retail price and the price of the items disclosed pursuant to paragraph (3), the supplemental label shall set forth that difference and describe it as “added mark-up.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 187, Sec. 2.   (AB 2227)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

24015.

(a) Motorized bicycles shall comply with those federal motor vehicle safety standards established pursuant to Chapter 301 (commencing with Section 30101) of Part A of Subtitle VI of Title 49 of the United States Code that apply to a motor-driven cycle, as that term is defined in
 regulations adopted pursuant to those provisions. These standards include, but are not limited to, provisions requiring a headlamp, taillamp, stoplamp, side and rear reflex reflectors, and adequate brakes.

(b) In addition to equipment required in subdivision (a), all motorized bicycles operated upon a highway shall be equipped with a mirror as required in subdivision (a) of Section 26709, a horn as required in Section 27000, and an adequate muffler as required in subdivision (a) of Section 27150.

(c) Except as provided in subdivisions (a) and (b), none of the provisions of this chapter relating to motorcycles and motor-driven cycles, as defined in this code, shall apply to a motorized bicycle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 198, Sec. 24.   (AB 3246)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

24016.

(a) An electric bicycle described in subdivision (a) of Section 312.5 shall meet the following criteria:

(1) Comply with the equipment and manufacturing requirements for bicycles adopted by the United States Consumer Product Safety Commission (16 C.F.R. 1512.1, et seq.).

(2) Operate in a manner so that the electric motor is disengaged or ceases to function when the brakes are applied, or operate in a manner such that the motor is engaged through a switch or mechanism that, if released or activated, will
 cause the electric motor to disengage or cease to function.

(b) A person operating an electric bicycle is not subject to the provisions of this code relating to financial responsibility, driver’s licenses, registration, and license plate requirements, and an electric bicycle is not a motor vehicle.

(c) Every manufacturer of an electric bicycle shall certify that it complies with the equipment and manufacturing requirements for bicycles adopted by the United States Consumer Product Safety Commission (16 C.F.R. 1512.1, et seq.).

(d) A person shall not tamper with or modify an electric bicycle described in subdivision (a) of Section 312.5 so as to change the speed capability of the bicycle, unless the bicycle continues to meet the definition of an electric bicycle under subdivision (a) of Section 312.5 and the person
 appropriately replaces the label indicating the classification required in subdivision (c) of Section 312.5.

(e) A person shall not sell a
 product, device, or application that can modify the speed capability of an electric bicycle such that it no longer meets the definition of an electric bicycle under subdivision (a) of Section 312.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 37, Sec. 1.   (AB 545)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

24017.

(a) A commercial motor vehicle, as defined in Section 260, operated by a motor carrier, whether the motor carrier is a private company or a public agency shall be equipped with a speedometer that shall be maintained in good working order. The speedometer shall indicate the vehicle’s speed in miles per hour or kilometers (km) per hour and shall be accurate to within plus or minus 5 miles per hour (8 km/hour) at a speed of 50 miles per hour (80 km/hour).

(b) This section does not apply to an autonomous vehicle, as defined in
 Section 38750,
 that is not capable of operation by a human driver seated in the
 vehicle, provided that this exemption is consistent with, or authorized by, any applicable federal law, regulation, or exemption thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 428, Sec. 2.   (SB 570)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

24018.

(a) Every transit bus operated by a motor carrier, whether that motor carrier is a private company or a public agency, that provides public transportation services shall be equipped with a two-way communication device that enables the driver to contact the motor carrier in the event of an emergency. The two-way communication devices shall be maintained in good working order.

(b) For the purposes of this section, “two-way communication device” is a radio, cellular telephone, or
 other similar device permitting communication between the transit bus driver and personnel responsible for the safety of operations of the motor carrier, including, but not limited to, the motor carrier’s dispatcher.

(c) This section does not apply to buses operated by a school district or on behalf of a school district.

(d) The commissioner shall upon request grant a nonrenewable one year extension to any motor carrier to comply with the requirements of this section.

(e) Nothing in this section shall require a motor carrier to replace an existing two-way communication device that currently meets the requirements of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 937, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

24019.

(a) A nongasoline heavy-duty onroad motor vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating of more than 14,000 pounds shall not be operated on a public road in this state if that vehicle has an illuminated malfunction indicator light (MIL) displaying the International Standards Organization (ISO) 2575 engine symbol F01, consistent with subdivision (d) of Section 1971.1 of Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations.

(b) A violation of this section shall be considered a mechanical violation under Section 40610. A peace officer shall not stop a vehicle solely on suspicion of a violation of this section.

(c) (1) A violation of this section is a correctable violation pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 40610) of Chapter 2 of Division 17. Except as provided in subdivision (d), an owner or operator of a vehicle found to be in violation of this section shall have 45 days to correct the violation and the vehicle shall not be prohibited from being used during this time.

(2) Except as provided in subdivision (d), an owner or operator of a vehicle that is used exclusively in the conduct of agricultural operations and that is found to be in violation of this section shall have a time period determined by the State Air Resources Board that is not less than 75 days from the date of the citation to correct the violation and the vehicle shall not be prohibited from being used during that
 time.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (c), a vehicle found to have willfully tampered emission controls, including the vehicle’s onboard diagnostics system, shall not be operated.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 298, Sec. 5.   (SB 210)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

24020.

(a) No dealer or person holding a retail seller’s permit shall sell a new or used vehicle equipped with a catalytic converter unless the catalytic converter has been permanently marked with the vehicle identification number (VIN) of the vehicle to which it is attached.

(b) This section does not apply to any of the following:

(1) A collector motor vehicle.

(2) A vehicle sold in any of the of the following circumstances:

(A) By a licensed automobile dismantler after being reported for
 dismantling pursuant to Section 11520.

(B) By or through a salvage pool after obtaining a salvage certificate pursuant to Section 11515, a nonrepairable vehicle certificate pursuant to Section 11515.2, a certificate of title for a vehicle described in subdivision (f) of Section 11515 or subdivision (f) of Section 11515.2, or a similar ownership document issued by another state.

(C) By or through a salvage disposal auction. For purposes of this section, “salvage disposal auction” means an auction where a person or entity, engaged primarily in the business of selling total loss salvage vehicles on behalf of insurance companies and that has more than eight business locations in California, sells total loss salvage vehicles.

(D) By or through a wholesale motor vehicle auction. For purposes of this section, “wholesale motor vehicle auction” means an auction where the dealer conducting the auction does not take ownership of the vehicle and the vehicle is sold to a nonretail buyer for resale.

(3) A vehicle where the buyer declines the seller’s offer to permanently mark the catalytic converter pursuant to subdivision (a) and the dealer discloses the catalytic converter permanent marking as a body part marking product in accordance with Sections 2981 and 2982.2 of the Civil Code.

(4) A motorcycle, as defined in Section 400.

(c) As used in this section, “permanently marked” means prominently engraved, etched, welded, metal stamped, acid
 marked, or otherwise permanently imprinted using a similarly reliable method of imparting a lasting mark on the exterior case of the catalytic converter.

(d) A dealer or person holding a retail seller’s permit who violates this section shall be guilty of an infraction punishable pursuant to Section 42001.

(e) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2025.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 2) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 858, Sec. 3.   (SB 55)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative January 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Lighting Equipment [24250. - 26106.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [24250. - 24255.]

24250.

During darkness, a vehicle shall be equipped with lighted lighting equipment as required for the vehicle by this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

24251.

Any requirement in this chapter as to the distance from which any lighting equipment shall render a person or vehicle visible or within which any lighting equipment shall be visible shall apply during darkness, directly ahead upon a straight, level unlighted highway, and under normal atmospheric conditions, unless a different time, direction, or condition is expressly stated.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

24252.

(a) (1) All lighting equipment of a required type installed on a vehicle shall at all times be maintained in good working order. Lamps shall be equipped with bulbs of the correct voltage rating corresponding to the nominal voltage at the lamp socket.

(2) For purposes of this section, “lighting equipment of a required type” includes lighting equipment specifically required by this code and lighting equipment required pursuant to Part 393 or Part 571 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(b) The voltage at a tail, stop, license plate, side marker or clearance lamp socket on a vehicle shall not be less than 85 percent of the design voltage of the bulb. Voltage tests shall be conducted with the engine operating.

(c) Two or more lamp or reflector functions may be combined, provided each function subject to requirements established by the department meets those
 requirements.

(1) A turn signal lamp may not be combined optically with a stoplamp unless the stoplamp is extinguished when the turn signal is flashing.

(2) A clearance lamp may not be combined optically with a taillamp or identification
 lamp.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 311, Sec. 5.   (SB 814)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

24253.

(a) All motor vehicles manufactured and first registered after January 1, 1970, shall be equipped so all taillamps are capable of remaining lighted for a period of at least one-quarter hour with the engine inoperative. This requirement shall be complied with by an energy storing system which is recharged by energy produced by the vehicle.

(b) All motorcycles manufactured and first registered after January 1, 1971, shall be equipped so all taillamps, when turned on, will remain lighted automatically for a period of at least one-quarter hour if the engine stops.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 217.)
-------------------------------------------

24254.

Whenever a requirement is declared as to the mounted height of lamps or reflectors, the height shall be measured from the center of the lamp or reflector to the level surface upon which the vehicle stands when it is without a load.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 25952 by Stats. 1969, Ch. 341.)
-------------------------------------------

24255.

(a) A vehicle may be equipped with a system to supplement the driver’s visibility of the roadway to the front or rear of the vehicle during darkness. This system may incorporate an illuminating device that emits radiation predominantly in the infrared region of the electromagnetic spectrum and a display monitor to provide an image visible to the driver of the vehicle. The system, or any portion of it, shall not obstruct the vision of the driver, and shall not emit any glaring light visible in any direction or to any person. The illuminating
 device may be mounted inside the vehicle, if it is constructed and mounted so as to prevent any direct or reflected light, other than a monitorial indicator emitted from the device, from being visible to the driver.

(b) The system shall be operated only with the headlamps lighted. An illuminating device for the system shall be interlocked with the headlamp switch so that it is operable only when the headlamps are lighted.

(c) (1) No part of the illuminating device may be physically or optically combined with any other required or permitted lighting device.

(2) The illuminating device may be installed within a housing containing other required or permitted lighting devices, if the function of the other devices is not impaired thereby.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 198, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Headlamps and Auxiliary Lamps [24400. - 24411.]

24400.

(a) A motor vehicle, other than a motorcycle, shall 

 be equipped with at least two headlamps, with at least one on each side of the front of the vehicle, and, except as to vehicles registered prior to January 1, 1930, they shall be located directly above or in advance of the front axle of the vehicle. The headlamps and every light source in any headlamp unit
 shall be located at a height of not more than 54 inches nor less than 22 inches.

(b) A motor vehicle, other than a motorcycle, shall be operated during darkness, or inclement weather, or both, with at least two lighted headlamps that comply with subdivision (a).

 (c) As used in subdivision (b), “inclement weather” is a weather condition that is either of the following:

(1) A condition that prevents a driver of a motor vehicle from clearly discerning a person or another motor vehicle on the highway from a distance of 1,000 feet.

(2) A condition requiring the windshield wipers to be in continuous use due to rain, mist, snow, fog, or other precipitation or atmospheric moisture.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 491, Sec. 43.   (SB 1318)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

24401.

Whenever any motor vehicle is parked or standing upon a highway any headlamp that is lighted shall be dimmed or on the lower beam.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

24402.

(a) Any motor vehicle may be equipped with not to exceed two auxiliary driving lamps mounted on the front at a height of not less than 16 inches nor more than 42 inches. Driving lamps are lamps designed for supplementing the upper beam from headlamps and may not be lighted with the lower beam.
